I'm not going anywhere, especially to Moscow.
'What were you thinking?
'I am?
I thought...
No, no, go write, don't have fun,' she said, wrinkling lips, 'and now I have to cut out these holes, see?
She took the scissors and started squealing.
'No, tell me what? 'He said, sitting down with her and watching the circular movement of the little scissors.'
'Oh, what did I think?'
I was thinking about Moscow, your back of the head.
'What exactly am I happy for?'
Unnaturally.
Too well,' he said, kissing her hand.
'For me, on the contrary, the better, the more natural.
'And you have a braid,' he said, turning her head carefully. 'Cause it's a pussy.
See, right here.
No, no, we're on the case.
The class wasn't going on, and they jumped off each other as they were guilty when Kuzma came in to report that the tea was served.
'And have you come from the city?' 'I asked Levin of Kuzma.'
'They've just arrived, they're working it out.
'Come quickly,' she said to him, leaving the office, 'or I will read the letters without you.
And let's play four hands.
As he stayed alone and took his notebooks into a new briefcase she bought, he began to wash his hands in a new washroom with new, yet elegant, supplies.
Levin smiled at his thoughts and shoved his head against them; a feeling like repentance tormented him. Something ashamed, tender, Capua, as he called it, was in his present life.
"It's not good to live this way," he thought. 'It's about three months away, and I'm barely doing anything.'
This is almost the first time I've taken my job seriously, so what?
I just started and quit.
Even my usual classes -- and I almost left them.
On the house -- and I hardly ever go or go.
I feel sorry for leaving her, but I can see she's bored.
And I thought it didn't count until I got married, and it didn't count, and that after I got married, the real one would start.
And three months soon, and I've never been so idle and useless.
No, we can't, we gotta get started.
Of course it wasn't her fault.
There was nothing to blame her for.
I should have been stronger myself to protect my male independence.
'Cause you can get used to it and teach her...
Of course it wasn't her fault,' he said to himself.
But it is hard for a person to be displeased not to blame someone else, or someone who is closest to him in what he is displeased with.
Levin was confused that it was not her fault (she could not have been guilty of anything), but that her upbringing was too superficial and self-involved (this fool Charsky: she, I know, wanted to, but could not stop him).
"Yeah, except for her interest in the house, except for her toilet, and apart from her broderie anglaise, she has no serious interests.
No interest in my business, no household, no men, no music in which she's pretty strong, no reading.
She's not doing anything, and she's perfectly satisfied."
Levin condemned it in the soul and did not realize yet that she was preparing for the period of activity that should have come upon her when she was at the same time the husband's wife, the housewife, would bear, feed, and raise her children.
He did not think that she knew it with her gut and, preparing for this terrible work, did not blame herself for the minutes of carelessness and happiness of love she now enjoyed, funning her future nest.
XVI
When Levin came upstairs, his wife sat at a new silver samurai behind a new tea machine and, after putting old Agatha Mikhaylovna with a cup of tea at the small table, she read a letter from Dolly, with whom they were in regular and frequent correspondence.
'You see, your lady put me down, told me to sit with her,' said Agatha Mikhaylovna, smiling friendlyly at Kitty.
In these words, Agatha Mikhaylovna Levin read the drama that had recently occurred between Agatha Mikhaylovna and Kitty.
He saw that, despite all the grief caused by Agatha Mikhaylovna's new mistress, who took away her reign, Kitty still defeated her and forced her to love her.
'I have read your letter,' said Kitty, giving him an illiterate letter. 'It's from that woman, I think, your brother...' she said. 'I didn't read it.
And this is from mine and from Dolly.
Imagine!
Dolly took Sarmatsky to Grish and Tanya's children's ball; Tanya was a Marquis.
But Levin did not listen to her: and when he was red, he took a letter from Mary Nikolaevna, the former mistress of his brother Nikolai, and read it.
It was the second letter from Maria Nikolaevna.
In her first letter, Maria Nikolaevna wrote that her brother had driven her away without guilt, and with touching naïveness added that although she was again in poverty, she did not ask for anything, wanted nothing but what killed her thought that Nikolai Dmitrievich would disappear without her because of her lack of health, and asked her brother to keep an eye on him.
Now she wrote another one.
She found Nikolai Dmitrievich, again joined him in Moscow, and went with him to the city of Paris, where he received a position in the service.
But that he had a fight with the boss and went back to Moscow, but the dear one was so sick that he could hardly get up,' she wrote."All of you were remembered, and there was no more money."
'Read, Dolly writes about you,' began Kitty with a smile, but suddenly she stopped to notice the changed look on her husband's face.
'What are you?
What is it?
'She writes to me that Nikolai, brother, is dying.
I'm going.
Kitty's face suddenly changed.
Thinking about Tana Marquis, about Dolly, it's all gone.
'When will you go?' 'She said.'
'Tomorrow.
'And I'm with you, may I? 'She said.'
'Kiti!
Well, what is it? 'He said with reproach.'
'As what? &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &lt;&gt;&gt;&gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; 'Why shouldn't I go?'
I won't bother you.
'I am going because my brother is dying,' said Levin. 'What are you...'
'For what?
For the same thing you're doing.
"And at this important moment for me, she only thinks she'll be bored alone," Levin thought. And that excuse in the case made him so angry.
'It is impossible,' he said strictly.
Agatha Mikhaylovna, when she saw it coming into a fight, quietly put the cup down and came out.
Kitty didn't even notice her.
The tone to which her husband had said the last words had insulted her, especially because he apparently did not believe what she had said.
'And I tell you that if you go and I go with you, I will certainly go,' she said in haste and anger. 'Why is it impossible?'
Why do you say it's impossible?
'Cause God knows where the roads are, the hotels.
You will embarrass me,' said Levin, trying to be cold-blooded.
'Nothing.'
I don't need anything. Wherever you can, there's me...
'Well, there's one thing about that woman that you can't get close to.'
'I don't know anything, and I don't want to know who's there or what.
I know my husband's brother is dying and my husband is going to see him, and I'm going with my husband to...
'Kiti! Don't be angry.
But think about it, it's so important that it hurts me to think that you're mixing a feeling of weakness, of not wanting to be alone.
Well, you're gonna be bored by yourself, so go to Moscow.
'Here, you always attribute to me evil, sneaky thoughts,' she cried with tears of insult and anger. 'I am nothing, I am not weak, I am nothing...'
I feel like it's my duty to be with my husband when he's in trouble, but you want to hurt me on purpose, you want not to understand...
To be some kind of slave! 'Screamed Levin, climbing up and no longer able to hold back his anger.' But the second he did, he felt like he was beating himself.
'So why did you marry?'
I'd be free.
Why if you're sorry? 'She spoke, jumped up, and ran into the living room.'
When he came for her, she was crying.
He began to talk, wanting to find words that could not convince her, but only calm her down.
But she wouldn't listen to him, and she wouldn't agree to anything.
He leaned over to her and took her resisting hand. He kissed her hand, kissed her hair, kissed her hand again, and she kept quiet.
But when he took it by both hands, he said, "Kiti!" 'She suddenly remembered, cried, and reconciled herself.'
It was decided to go together tomorrow.
Levin said to his wife that he believed that she wanted to go only to be of use, agreed that the presence of Mary Nikolaevna at his brother's house was not indecent; but in the deep part of his soul he was displeased with her and himself.
He was displeased with her for not being able to let him go when he needed it (and how strange it was for him to think that he, so recently not dared to believe that she could love him, now felt unhappy that she loved him too much!) and displeased with himself for failing to stand up to character.
Even more deeply, he did not agree that she did not care about the woman with her brother, and he thought with horror of all possible clashes.
One thing is that his wife, Kitty, would be in the same room as a girl, making him freak out with disgust and horror.
XVII
The hotel of the city of Reuben, which was home to Nikolai Levin, was one of those hotels in the country, which is based on new and improved models, with the best intentions of purity, comfort, and even elegance, but which, according to the public visiting them, become, with extraordinary speed, dirty cobblers with a claim for modern improvements, making this claim even worse than the old, just dirty hotels.
This hotel has already come into this state; and the soldier in the dirty coat, smoking the papyroska at the door, showing the doorman, and the irony, through, dark and unpleasant stairwell, and the loose sex in the filthy frack, and the common room with the dusty wax bouquet of flowers that adorns the table, and the dirt, dust and mud everywhere, together with some new modern railway self-satisfied concern at the hotel, have made the hardest sense on the Levins after their young lives, especially that the false impression produced by the hotel has never been reconciled with what was expected of them.
As always, it turned out that after the question of what price they wanted the number, there was no good number: one good number was occupied by the railway auditor, the other by a lawyer from Moscow, and the third by Princess Astafiev of the village.
There was one dirty number left next to which they promised to interview the other by tonight.
Aggressing his wife for having fulfilled what he was waiting for, it was precisely that at the time of his arrival, when his heart was moved by the thought that he was with his brother, that he had to take care of her, instead of running immediately to his brother, Levin introduced his wife into his number.
'Go, go!' she said, looking at him with a shy, guilty look.
He came out of the door silently and immediately ran into Maria Nikolaevna, who learned of his arrival and did not dare enter him.
She was exactly the same as he saw her in Moscow: the same woolly dress and bare hands and neck and the same kind-hearted, dumb, slightly full, jabby face.
'Well, what?
How's he doing? What?
'Very bad.
They don't get up.
They were all waiting for you.
They're... you're... with your wife.
Levin did not understand at the first minute what embarrassed her, but she immediately explained it to him.
'I will go, I will go to the kitchen,' she said. 'They will be pleased.'
They have heard, and they are known and remembered abroad.
Levin realized that she understood his wife, and did not know what to say.
'Come on, let's go! 'He said.'
But he just moved, his number door opened, and Kitty looked out.
Levin blushed with shame, and with shame upon his wife, who put herself and him into this plight; but Mary Nikolaevna blushed even more.
She clenched and blushed to tears and grabbed the ends of the handkerchief with both hands, folded them with red fingers, without knowing what to say or what to do.
Levin's first moment saw the expression of greedy curiosity in the look that Kitty looked at that terrible woman, which she did not understand; but it lasted only one moment.
'Well, what is it?'
What is he? 'She turned to her husband and then to her.'
'You can't talk in the hallway! 'Tell Levin, looking back at the gentleman, who was displeased with his feet, as if he was walking along the hallway in his business.'
'Come in, then,' said Kitty, turning to Maria Nikolaevna, who was recovering; but when she noticed the frightened face of her husband, 'or go, come and come after me,' she said, and returned to the numbering.
Levin went to his brother.
He never expected what he saw and felt at his brother's.
He expected to find the same state of self - deception that he had heard so often occurred at the quacks and that struck him so hard during his brother's autumn arrival.
He expected to find physical signs of nearing death more certain, greater weakness, more thinning, but still almost the same situation.
He expected to experience the same feeling of pity for the loss of his beloved brother and the horror he had experienced at the time, but only to a greater extent. And he prepared himself for it; but he found a very different thing.
In a filthy little number, spit on painted walls, behind which a thin partition was spoken, in a suffocated scent of air, there was a blanketed body on the side of the wall of the bed.
One hand of this body was above the blanket, and a giant hand, like a burglary, was attached to a thin and straight from the beginning to the middle of a long chick.
The head was lying side by side on the pillow.
Levin was seen with sweaty rare hair on his temples and a tight, clear forehead.
"It can't be that scary body was Nikolai's brother," Levin thought.
But he came closer, saw his face, and doubt was no longer possible.
Despite a terrible change in his face, Levin should have looked up at these living, rising up into his eyes, and noticed a slight movement of his mouth under a sticky mustache to understand the terrible truth that this dead body was a living brother.
The shiny eyes looked hard and down at the brother who came in. At once, this view established a living relationship between the living.
Levin immediately felt downright in his longing and remorse for his happiness.
When Constantin took his hand, Nikolai smiled.
The smile was weak, slightly visible, and despite the smile, the sharp expression of the eyes did not change.
'You didn't expect me to be like this,' he barely said.
'Yes... no,' said Levin, confused in his words. 'How did you not let me know before, that is, during my wedding?'
I've been looking everywhere.
You should have said something to keep quiet, and he didn't know what to say, especially since his brother didn't answer anything, but he watched without letting his eyes down, and he obviously understood the meaning of every word.
Levin told his brother that his wife had come with him.
Nikolai expressed his pleasure but said he was afraid to scare her with his position.
There's been a silence.
Suddenly Nikolai moved and started to say something.
Levin was waiting for something particularly significant and important in his face, but Nikolai spoke about his health.
He accused the doctor, regretted that there was no Moscow famous doctor, and Levin realized that he was still hoping.
After choosing the first minute of silence, Levin stood up, wanting to get rid of a painful feeling for a moment, and said that he would bring his wife.
'Well, all right, and I'm telling you to clean it up here.
It's dirty and smelly in here, I think.
Masha! Clean it up here,' said the sick man with difficulty. 'If you put it away, go away,' he added, looking at his brother in question.
Levin didn't answer anything.
When he entered the hallway, he stopped.
He said he would bring his wife, but now that he was aware of the feeling he had felt, he decided that, on the contrary, he would try to persuade her not to go to a sick person.
"What's she torturing like me for?" 'He thought.'
'Well, what?
How? 'with a frightened face asked Kitty.
'Oh, that's awful, awful!
Why are you here? 'Said Levin.'
Kitty remained silent for a few seconds, shy and sorry for her husband; then she came and took his elbow with both hands.
'Kostya! Take me to him, it'll be easier for the two of us.
You just bring me down, get me down, please, and go away,' she said. 'You understand that it is harder for me to see you and not see him.
There I may be useful to you and to him.
Please, let me! 'She begged her husband, as if the happiness of her life depended on it.'
Levin had to agree, and after recovering and completely forgetting Mary Nikolaevna, he went back to his brother with Kitty.
Easy to walk in and look at her husband and show him a brave and sympathetic face, she entered the sick man's room and turned her back and closed the door quietly.
With unheard steps, she quickly approached the sick man &apos; s bedside and walked in such a way that he did not need to turn his head, immediately took into her fresh young hand his huge arm &apos; s oatmeal, and shook her and with that woman, who was a woman, not an insulting and sympathetic, quiet, talking to him.
'We met, but we didn't know each other in Soden,' she said. 'You didn't think I'd be your sister.
'You wouldn't recognize me? 'He said with a smile at her entrance.'
'No, I would have found out.
How well you did, what you let us know!
There hasn't been a day for Kostya not to think of you and worry about you.
But the recovery of the patient did not last long.
She also did not stop talking about how his face was once again exposed to the harsh, downright expression of envy of the dying to the living.
'I'm afraid you're not very well here,' she said, turning away from his close gaze and looking around the room. 'We'll have to ask the owner of the other room,' she said to her husband, 'and then we'll get closer.
XVIII
Levin could not look at his brother calmly, nor could he be natural and calm in his presence.
When he entered the patient, his eyes and attention became unconscious, and he neither saw nor distinguished the details of his brother's situation.
He heard a terrible smell, saw dirt, a mess and a painful situation and a groaning, and felt that it was impossible to help.
It never occurred to him to think about all the details of the patient's condition, to think about how it was lying there under the blanket, that body, like bent around, had these thin tibia, stakes, back, and if there was any better way to put them down, to do something that wasn't better, but less bad.
He was getting cold on his back when he started thinking about all these details.
He was convinced that nothing could be done either to prolong life or to alleviate suffering. But the realization that he acknowledged all help was impossible, felt sick and annoyed him.
Therefore Levin was even heavier.
Being in the patient's room was painful for him, not being worse.
And he went out and entered again under various pretexts, unable to be alone.
But Kitty thought, felt, and acted very differently.
When she saw the patient, she felt sorry for him. And the pity in her woman's soul did not produce the same sense of horror and vileness she had in her husband, but the need to act, to learn all the details of his condition, and to help them.
And since she had no doubt that she had to help him, she had no doubt that it was possible to do so, and immediately she took action.
The very details that her husband was horrified about immediately drew her attention. She sent for the doctor, sent her to the pharmacy, forced the girl who came with her and Maria Nikolaevna to get revenge, wash the dust, wash, wash, wash, wash, put something under the blanket.
Something she ordered was served and taken out of the patient's room.
She herself went to her number several times, disregarding the gentlemen she met, and she drew and brought sheets, pillowcases, towels, shirts.
The footman who served lunch in the general hall to engineers came several times with an angry face to her call and couldn't help but carry out her orders because she had given them so kindly that it was impossible to leave her.
Levin did not approve of all this: he did not believe that any benefit would come from it for the sick.
Most of all, he was afraid that the patient would not get angry.
But the patient seemed indifferent to it, not angry, but ashamed, even as if he were interested in what she was doing.
When he returned from the doctor to whom Kitty had sent him, Levin opened the door and caught the patient the minute Kitty changed his underwear.
The long white back staves with huge outstanding scapulas and sticking ribs and vertebrae were exposed, and Maria Nikolaevna and the footman were confused in the sleeve of the shirt and unable to point a long, hanging hand into it.
Kitty, who had rushed to close the door behind Levin, did not look that way; but the sick man groaned, and she quickly went to him.
'Hurry,' she said.
'Don't go,' said the patient angryly, 'I myself...'
'What do you say? 'Required Mary Nikolaevna.
But Kitty heard and realized that he felt ashamed and uncomfortable about being naked in front of her.
'I don't look, I don't look! 'She said, adjusting her hand.' 'Maria Nikolaevna, and you will come from the other side, correct,' she added.
'Come on, please, in my little bag of scraps,' she turned to her husband, 'you know, in the side pocket, please bring me some while they're all cleaned up here.
When Levin returned with a stick, he found a sick man already laid down, and everything around him was completely altered.
The heavy smell was replaced by the smell of vinegar and perfume, which, with lips out and brown cheeks, was sprayed into the tube by Kitty.
The dust was nowhere to be seen, there was a carpet under the bed. The table had neat glasses, Countess and proper underwear and the work of Broderie anglaise Kitty.
On the other table, by the bed of the sick man, there were drinks, candles, and powders.
The sick man himself, washed and brushed, lay on clean sheets, on raised pillows, in a clean shirt with a white collar about an unnaturally thin neck and with a new expression of hope, without letting his eyes down, stare at Kitty.
The doctor brought by Levin and found at the club was not the one who treated Nikolai Levin and whom he was displeased with.
The new doctor pulled out the tube and listened to the patient, shook his head, prescribed the medicine, and explained in particular how to take the medicine first, then -- what to do with the diet.
He advised eggs of raw or slightly welded and celery water with steam milk of known temperature.
When the doctor left, the patient said something to his brother; but Levin heard only the last words: "Your Katja," but the look with which he looked at her, Levin realized that he praised her.
He called Katya, too, as he called her.
'I am much better,' he said. 'I would have recovered with you a long time ago.
That's so good! 'He took her hand and pulled it to his lips, but, as if afraid it would be unpleasant for her, thought, released her, and only the groin--the dil of her.'
Kitty took that hand with both hands and shook it.
'Now put me on the left side and go to sleep,' he said.
No one heard what he said, one Kitty understood.
She understood because she kept following the thought of what he needed.
'On the other side,' she said to her husband, 'he always sleeps on the other side.
Put him down, it's unpleasant to call the servants. I can't.
Can't you? 'She turned to Maria Nikolaevna.'
'I'm afraid,' said Maria Nikolaevna.
As scary as Levin was to hold this scary body with his hands, to take up those places under the blanket he did not want to know about, but by giving in to his wife's influence Levin made his determined face as his wife knew, and by letting his hands in, he took up, but despite his strength was struck by the strange weight of these exhausted members.
While he was turning it around, feeling his neck hugged by a huge, thin hand, Kitty quickly, unheard, turned the pillow, knocked it over, and fixed the head of the sick man and his rare hair, stuck again on the temple.
The sick man held his brother's hand in his hand.
Levin felt that he wanted to do something with his hand and pulled it somewhere. Levin gave himself up, calming down.
Yeah, he pulled her to his mouth and kissed her.
Levin was shaken by the tears and, unable to speak, left the room.
XIX
"Hidden from the wise, and opened up to the children and the unreasonable." 'That's what Levin thought of his wife, talking to her this evening.
Levin did not think of the Evangel saying because he thought he was wise. He didn't think he was wise, but he couldn't help but know that he was smarter than his wife and Agatha Mikhaylovna, and he couldn't help but know that when he thought of death, he thought with all his soul.
He also knew that many men's big minds, whose thoughts he had read about it, had thought about it and did not know one hundred things his wife and Agatha Mikhaylovna knew about it.
As different as the two women were, Agatha Mikhaylovna and Katja, as her brother Nikolai called her, and as Levin was now particularly pleased to call her, they were quite similar.
Both undoubtedly knew what life was and what death was, and even though they could not answer and understand even the questions that were presented to Levin, both did not doubt the meaning of this phenomenon and were completely equal, not just among themselves, but shared that view with millions of people, they looked at it.
The proof that they knew firmly what death was was was that they knew, without doubt, for no second, how to deal with the dying, and they were not afraid of them.
Levin and others, though they could say much about death, clearly did not know because they feared death and were determined not to know what to do when people died.
If Levin had been alone with his brother Nikolai now, he would have looked awful at him and waited even more horribly, and would have done nothing else.
Not only did he not know what to say, how to watch how to walk.
He could not speak of an outsider; he could not speak of death, nor of a dark one.
You can't keep quiet, either. "Look -- he's gonna think I'm studying it, I'm afraid; not looking -- he's gonna think what I'm thinking about.
Walking on chicks, he's gonna be displeased; on his whole leg, he's ashamed."
Kitty obviously didn't think and had no time to think of herself; she thought of him because she knew something, and everything went well.
She also spoke of herself, and of her wedding, and smiled, and felt pity, and caressed him, and spoke of the cases of recovery, and all things went well; it became clear to her that she knew.
The proof that her and Agatha Mikhaylovna's activities were not instinctive, animal, unreasonable, was that, apart from physical care, alleviating suffering, and Agatha Mikhaylovna and Kitty demanded for a dying person something more important than physical care and something that had nothing to do with physical conditions.
Agatha Mihailovna, speaking of the dead old man, said, "Well, thank God, you were involved, you were gathered together, God let everyone die like this." In the same way, apart from all the care for the underwear, the bed, the drink, on the first day she had to convince the patient to be involved.
When Levin returned from the patient overnight to his two numerals, he sat down with his head down, not knowing what to do.
Not to mention eating, sleeping, thinking about what they would do, he couldn't even talk to his wife; he was ashamed.
Kitty, on the other hand, was more active than ordinary. It was even more lively than ordinary.
She told me to bring dinner, she took out her own things, she helped make the beds, and she didn't forget to fill them with Persian powder.
It had the excitement and the speed of the considerations that men had before fighting, fighting, in the dangerous and decisive moments of life, the moments when a man once for all showed his price and that everything that had passed was not a gift, but a preparation for those minutes.
The whole case was in dispute with her, and she wasn't 12 yet, as all the things were taken cleanly, neatly, somehow, the numberer became like a house, her rooms: beds, brushes, combs, mirrors out, napkins of a post.
Levin found it inexcusable to eat, to sleep, to speak even now, and felt that every move he made was indecent.
She was scrubbing the brushes, but she was doing it so that there was nothing offensive about it.
There was, however, nothing they could do, and they could not sleep for a long time, and they did not even go to bed for a long time.
'I am very glad that I persuaded him to gather tomorrow,' she said, sitting in a shirt in front of her folding mirror and combing soft, fragrant hairs with a frequent comb. 'I've never seen this before, but I know my mother told me that there are prayers for healing.
'Do you really think he can recover?' 'Said Levin, looking at the constantly closing, as soon as she had drawn the crest forward, the narrow row back her round head.
'I asked the doctor: he said that he could not live for more than three days.
But how can they know?
I'm really glad I talked him into it,' she said, touching her husband because of her hair. 'It can all be,' she added with that special, somewhat clever expression that she always had on her face when she spoke of religion.
After talking about religion, when they were still a bride and groom, neither he nor she ever started talking about it, but she performed her church rituals, prayers always with the same calm mind that it was necessary.
Despite his belief otherwise, she was firmly convinced that he was as much and even better a Christian as she was, and that all he was saying about it was one of his funny men's tricks, like what he was saying about broderie anglaise: it was like good people stubbling holes and she deliberately took them out, etc.
'Yes, this woman, Marya Nikolaevna, did not know how to arrange all this,' said Levin. 'And... I must confess that I am very, very glad that you have come.' You're so clean that...' He took her hand and didn't kiss her (kiss her hand in this close proximity to death) but he only shook it with a guilty expression, looking at her bright eyes.
'It would have been so painful for you alone,' she said, and she lifted up her hands, which had covered her cheek red with pleasure, and turned her back on the back of her head and stitched them up. 'No,' she continued,' she did not know...
I learned a lot in Soden, to be happy.
'Has there been a disease like that?'
'Better.'
'It is a terrible thing for me that I cannot help not seeing him as he was young...'
You wouldn't believe what a lovely young man he was, but I didn't understand him then.
'I really, really do.'
I feel like we'd be friends with him,' she said, and she was afraid for what she said, looked back at her husband, and tears came to her eyes.
'Yes, you would,' he said, sad. 'This is exactly one of the people they say they are not for this world.
'But we have many days to go to bed,' said Kitty, looking at her tiny watch.
XX
DEATH
The other day, the patient was brought in and gathered.
During the ceremony, Nikolai Levin prayed warmly.
In his great eyes, leaning toward the image placed on a napkin, covered with a coloured napkin table, he expressed such a passionate prayer and hope that Levin was awful to look at it.
Levin knew that this passionate prayer and hope would only make it even harder for him to separate from the life he loved so much.
Levin knew his brother and the course of his thoughts; he knew that his disbelief had occurred not because it was easier for him to live without faith, but because step by step the modern-scientific explanations of the phenomena of the world had replaced faith, and therefore he knew that his current return had not been lawful, accomplished by the same thought, but only temporary, self-interested, with the mad hope of healing.
Levin also knew that Kitty had reinforced that hope with further accounts of the extraordinary healings she had heard.
Levin knew all this, and he was painfully hurt to look at this beggar, full of hope, and this wretched brush of hand, struggling to lift up and put the cross sign on the tight, tight forehead, on these excruciating shoulders and grinning empty breasts that could no longer carry into themselves the life that the patient had asked for.
During the mystery, Levin prayed, too, and did what he, a nonbeliever, had done a thousand times.
He said, "Do, if you exist, that this man may be healed, and you will save him and me."
After the anointed, the patient suddenly felt much better.
He never coughed for an hour, smiled, kissed Kitty's hand, with tears because of her, and said that he was well, not hurt anywhere, and that he felt appetite and strength.
He even went up when he got his soup and asked for another cutlet.
However hopeless he was, as clearly as it was when he looked at him, that he could not recover, Levin and Kitty were in the same happy and shy hour, as if to be mistaken, arousing.
'Better. 'Yes, much. 'Awesome. 'No wonder.' 'It is better, though,' they whispered, smiling at each other.
It was short-term blasphemous.
The patient fell asleep calmly, but after half an hour the cough woke him up. And suddenly all hope was lost in the people around him and in him himself.
The reality of suffering, no doubt, even without memories of previous hopes, destroyed them in Levin and Kitty and in the sickest.
Without even remembering what he believed half an hour ago, as if he were ashamed and reminded of it, he demanded that he be given iodine for inhalation in a stone covered with a paper with punctured holes.
Levin gave him the jar, and the same look of hope with which he met was now rushing toward his brother, demanding from him confirmation of the doctor's words that the inhalation of iodine produced miracles.
'What, Kathy isn't here? 'He snorted, looking back when Levin reluctantly confirmed the doctor's words. 'No, you can say that...'
I made this comedy for her.
She's so sweet, but you and I can't fool ourselves.
That's what I believe,' he said, and he squeezed the knuckle with his bony hand to breathe over it.
At 8 p.m. Levin had tea with his wife in her number when Maria Nikolaevna ran to them, suffocating. She was pale and her lips shivered.
'Death! 'She whispered.' 'I'm afraid he's about to die.
Both ran to him.
He sat up, reclining on his hand, on the bed, bent his long back, and lowered his head.
'How do you feel? 'I asked Levin in whisper after silence.'
'I feel like I'm leaving,' said Nikolai with extreme certainty, slowly pressing out words.
He didn't lift his head, but he just pointed his eyes up without reaching his brother's face. 'Katha, go away!' he said again.
Levin jumped up and whispered her out.
'I am going,' he said again.
'Why do you think? 'Said Levin to say something.'
'Because I am going away,' he repeated as if he had loved that expression. 'The end.'
Maria Nikolaevna approached him.
'You'd lie down, you'd feel better,' she said.
'I will lie still soon,' he said, 'dead," he said, laughingly, angry. 'Well, put it down if you like.
Levin put his brother on his back, sat beside him, and, not breathing, looked at his face.
The dying man lay, closed his eyes, but his forehead was occasionally moved by muscles like a man who had deep and intense thoughts.
Levin was reluctant to think with him that this was now happening in him, but despite all the thought he had to go with him, he saw by the expression of this calm, rigid face and the play of the muscle over his eyebrow that it was clear to the dying man that it was still dark for Levin.
'Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah. 'Wait. 'He kept quiet again. 'That's it!' he suddenly sedativeed out, as if everything had been settled for him. 'Oh, my God! 'He spoke and sighed heavily.'
Maria Nikolaevna felt his legs.
'They are getting cold,' she whispered. For a long, long time, Levin felt that the patient was lying still.
But he was still alive and often sighed.
Levin is tired of the stress of his mind. He felt that, despite the stress of his mind, he could not understand what had happened.
He felt that he was long behind the dying man. He could no longer think about the very question of death, but he was not willing to think about what he would now have to do: close his eyes, dress, order a coffin.
And, strangely, he felt completely cold and felt no grief, no loss, no less pity for his brother.
If he had feelings for his brother now, he would rather be jealous of the knowledge that the dying man now has, but he cannot have.
He's been sitting on him like this for a long time, waiting for the end. But the end didn't come.
The door opened, and Kitty showed up.
Levin stood up to stop her.
But while he was up, he heard the dead man's movement.
'Don't go,' said Nikolai, and extended his hand.
Levin delivered his hand to him, and angryly waved to his wife to leave.
With the dead man's hand in his hand, he sat for half an hour, an hour, another hour.
He wasn't thinking about dying anymore.
He was thinking about what Kitty was doing, who lived in the next number, whether the doctor had his own house.
He wanted to eat and sleep.
He carefully sprained his hand and felt his legs.
The legs were cold, but the patient was breathing.
Levin wanted to go out on the chicks again, but the sick man moved again and said, "Don't go away. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know.
It dawned; the condition of the patient was the same.
Levin slowly expounded his hand, not looking at the dying one, and went to his side and fell asleep.
When he woke up, instead of hearing of the death of the brother he was waiting for, he learned that the patient had gone back to his former state.
He began to sit down again, cough, eat again, speak again, and stop talking about death again, express hope for recovery again, and become more annoying and darker than ever before.
No one, no brother, no Kitty, could calm him down.
He was angry at everyone, and he was talking to everyone about trouble, blaming everyone for his suffering, and demanding that he be brought in by a famous doctor from Moscow.
To all the questions he was asked about how he felt, he answered in the same way with the expression of anger and reproach:
'I'm suffering awful, I can't bear it! The patient was suffering more and more, especially from beds that could not be cured, and became more and more angry with the surrounding--things, blaming them for everything and especially for the fact that he had not been brought in by a doctor from Moscow.
Kitty did her best to help him, to calm him; but it was all in vain, and Levin saw that she herself, both physically and morally, was exhausted, even though she did not confess it.
The sense of death caused by all his goodbyes to life the night he called his brother was destroyed.
Everyone knew that he was bound to die soon, that he was half dead already.
All of them wanted him to die as soon as possible, and all of them, hiding it, gave him medicine from a stick, searched for medicine, doctors, and lied to him, to themselves and to each other.
It was all a lie, a filthy, insulting and sacrilege lie. Both this lie and his personality, and because he loved the dying one most, Levin felt particularly painful.
Levin, long thought of reconciling his brothers before he died, wrote to Brother Sergei Ivanovich and, having received his reply, read the letter to the sick man.
Koznyshev wrote that he could not come himself, but in touching terms he asked for his brother's forgiveness.
The patient didn't say anything.
'What shall I write to him? 'I asked Levin.' 'I hope you're not mad at him?
'No, not at all!' said Nikolai with regret. 'Write him to send a doctor to me.
Three more days passed, and the patient was still in the same situation.
The desire of his death was now felt by all who had seen him: both the footmen of the hotel, and her master, and all the guests, and the doctor, and Mary of Nikolaevna, and Levin, and Kitty.
Only one patient did not express that feeling but, on the contrary, was angry that the doctor had not been brought in and continued to take medication and talk about life.
Only in rare moments when opium made him forget for a moment of constant suffering did he sometimes say in half-sleep what was stronger than everyone else in his soul: "Oh, at least one end!" Or, "When it's over!"
Suffering, evenly increasing, did their work and prepared him for death.
There was no position in which he suffered, there was no moment in which he forgot, there was no place, no part of his body that did not suffer, nor did they torment him.
Even the memories, the impressions, the thoughts of this body have already caused the same disgust in him as the body itself.
The view of other people, their speeches, their own memories -- all of this was painful for him.
Those around them felt this, and unconsciously allowed themselves no free movement, no conversation, no expression of their desires.
His whole life was in the same sense of suffering and desire to get rid of him.
There was obviously a coup that was supposed to make him see death as satisfying his desires, as happiness.
In the past, each individual desire caused by suffering or deprivation, such as hunger, fatigue, thirst, was satisfied with the departure of the body, which gave pleasure; but now the deprivation and suffering were not satisfied, and the attempt to satisfaction caused a new suffering.
So all the desires came together in one thing -- the desire to get rid of all the suffering and their source, their bodies.
But in order to express this desire for liberation, he did not have words, so he did not speak of it, and by habit he required the satisfaction of desires that could no longer be fulfilled.
"Put me on the other side," he said and immediately afterwards demanded that he be placed as before.
"Give me the broth.
Take the broth away.
Tell me something you're not saying."
And as soon as they started talking, he closed his eyes and expressed fatigue, indifference, and disgust.
On the tenth day of her arrival in the city of Kitty, she became ill.
She had a headache, vomiting, and she couldn't get out of bed all morning.
The doctor explained that the disease was caused by fatigue, anxiety, and ordered her to be calm.
After lunch, however, Kitty got up and went to work with a sick person, as always.
He looked hard at her when she came in, and smiled contemptiblely when she said she was sick.
On that day, he kept sniffing and groaning.
'How do you feel?' 'She asked him.'
'Worst,' he barely said. 'It hurts!
'Where does it hurt?
'Everywhere.
'Now it is over, look,' said Mary Nikolaevna, whispering, but so that the sick, very sensitive, as Levin noticed, must have heard her.
Levin stitched at her and looked back at the patient.
Nikolai heard; but those words did not impress him. His look was still so constricted and tense.
'What do you think?' 'And Levin asked her when she had married him into the hallway.'
'He began to take a look at himself,' said Maria Nikolaevna.
'How do I pick it up?'
'That's it,' she said, pulling the folds of her woolly dress.
Indeed, he noticed that all day, a sick man was grabbing himself and trying to hold something back.
Maria Nikolaevna's prediction was correct.
The sick man was no longer able to raise his hands by night, but to look before himself without changing the carefully focused expression of his eyes.
Even when a brother or Kitty leaned over him, so that he could see them, he looked at them the same way.
Kitty sent for the priest to read the waste house.
While the priest was reading the waste house, the dying man showed no signs of life; his eyes were closed.
Levin, Kitty and Maria Nikolaevna were standing by the bed.
Prayer had not yet been honored by the priest, as the dying man reached out, sighed, and opened his eyes.
At the end of the prayer, the priest attached a cross to the cold forehead, then slowly wrapped it into the epetrahill and, remaining silent for two minutes, touched a cold and bloodless giant hand.
'It is over,' said the priest, and wanted to stand back; but suddenly the dead man's moustache was moving, and clearly in silence heard from the depth of his chest a certain sharp sound:
'Not exactly...'
Soon.
And a minute later, the face became bright, there was a smile under the moustache, and the women gathered were anxious to clean up the dead man.
The sight of his brother and the proximity of his death renewed in Levin's soul the sense of horror over his indistinctness and together with the proximity and inevitability of his death that struck him on the autumn evening when his brother came to him.
The feeling was now even stronger than before; even less than before, he felt capable of understanding the meaning of death, and it was even more awful to him that it was inevitable; but now, thanks to his wife's closeness, the feeling did not lead him to despair: despite his death, he felt the need to live and love.
He felt that love had saved him from despair and that that love, under the threat of despair, had become even stronger and cleaner.
Before he could see it, one secret of death, which remained unsolved, was discovered, as another, equally unsolved, caused love and life.
The doctor confirmed his suspicions about Kitty.
Her illness was pregnancy.
XXI
From the moment he realized from his explanations with Betsy and with Stepan Arkadjić that he had only been required to leave his wife alone without having bothered her with her presence, and that his wife herself wanted to do so, he felt so lost that he could not decide anything on his own, did not know what he wanted now, and gave up in the hands of those who were so happy to do his business to all of them.
It was only when Anna had already left his house that a British woman sent him to ask him if she should have lunch with him, or separately, that he understood his position clearly for the first time and was terrified of him.
The hardest thing about this situation was that he couldn't connect and reconcile his past with what was now.
Not since he had lived happily with his wife, he was embarrassed, but the transition from that who passed away to the knowledge of his wife's infidelity was painful; it was a difficult condition, but it was understandable to him.
If the wife had left him when she had declared her infidelity, he would have been sad and unhappy, but he would not have been in the same inhospitable position as he now felt.
He could no longer reconcile his recent forgiveness, his condescension, his love for a sick wife and another's child with what was now, that, as a reward for all of this, he now became one, disgraced, mocked, unsatisfied, and despised by all.
The first two days after his wife's departure, Alexandrovich accepted the applicants, the ruler of the affairs, travelled to the committee and went out for lunch in the dining room, as usual.
Ignoring what he was doing, he worked hard on his soul these two days just to look calm and even indifferent.
In response to questions about how to handle Anna Arkadievna's belongings and rooms, he made the greatest effort to be seen as a man for whom the event had not been unexpected and had nothing to do with ordinary events, and he had achieved his goal: no one could have noticed signs of despair.
But on the second day after he left, when Corney billed him from a fashion store that Anna forgot to pay, and reported that the commander himself was here, Alexi Alexandrovich told him to call the boss.
'Excuse me, Your Excellency, that I dare to disturb you.
If, however, you wish to contact her Excellency, do you have the pleasure of indicating their address?
Alexei Alexandrovich wondered how the orderman seemed, and suddenly, turning around, he sat down at the table.
Put his head on his hands, he sat in that position for a long time, tried to talk a few times and stopped.
Having understood the feelings of the barn, Corney asked the orderman to come another time.
When he was alone again, he realized that he could no longer stand the role of firmness and tranquillity.
He told me to postpone the waiting carriage, he didn't tell anyone to take them, and he didn't come out for lunch.
He felt that he would not be able to withstand the common assault of contempt and violence that he had clearly seen on the face of both that commander and Cornea and all those whom he had met on those two days.
He felt that he could not turn people's hatred away, for it was not because he was a fool (then he could try to be better), but because he was ashamed and disgustingly unhappy.
He knew what it was, because his heart was broken, they would be ruthless to him.
He felt that people would destroy him as dogs suffocated a dog screaming in pain.
He knew that the only escape from humans was to hide his wounds from them, and he unconsciously tried to do so for two days, but now he felt unable to continue this unequal struggle.
His despair was heightened by the realization that he was completely alone with his grief.
Not only did he not have a single person in Petersburg who could express everything he felt, who felt sorry for him not as a senior official, not as a member of society, but simply as a suffering person; nor did he have such a person anywhere.
Alexei Alexandrovich grew up an orphan.
There were two brothers.
They didn't remember their father, their mother died when he was ten years old.
It was a small condition.
Uncle Karenin, an important official and once a favourite of the late emperor, raised them.
After completing his courses in upper secondary school and university with medals, he immediately entered a visible service road with the help of his uncle, and from that time on he was extremely ambitious.
Neither at the gymnasium, nor at the university, nor after he was in the service of Alexei Alexandrovich, he had no friendship with anyone.
His brother was the closest person to him, but he served under the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, always living abroad, where he died shortly after he married Alexei Alexandrovich.
During his governorship, Aunt Anna, a wealthy Orange Lady, brought down a young man, but a young governor with her niece, and put him in a position that he should have either spoken or left the city.
Alexei Alexandrovich hesitated for a long time.
There were as many arguments for that move as there was against it, and there was no strong reason for him to change his rule: to abstain in doubt; but Aunt Anna inspired him through a friend that he had already compromised a girl and that honour obliged him to propose.
He proposed and gave the bride and wife all the sense he could.
The affection he had for Anna ruled out in his heart the last needs of a heart - to - man relationship. And now, of all his acquaintances, he's never had anyone close to him.
There were many things called connections; but there was no friendship.
Alexey Alexandrovich had many people he could invite to his luncheon, ask him to take part in a case of interest to him, a protection to some seeker with whom he could discuss openly the actions of others and of the highest government; however, the attitude towards these individuals was confined to one well-defined custom and habit that could not be taken out of.
There was a fellow universitymate with whom he was drawn after and with whom he could speak about personal grief; but that friend was the trustee in the long-distance school district.
Of those who were in Petersburg, the office governor and the doctor were the closest and most likely.
Michael Vasiljevic Sluddin, the ruler of affairs, was a simple, intelligent, kind, and moral man, in which he felt a personal affection; but their five - year service activity had placed a barrier between them for emotional reasons.
Alexey Alexandrovich, after completing his subscription, kept quiet for a long time, looking at Michael Vasiljevic, and tried several times, but couldn't speak.
He's already prepared the phrase, "Have you heard of my grief?" But he ended up saying, as usual, "So make this for me," and he let him go.
Another man was a doctor, who was also well placed for him; but there was a long-standing tacit agreement between them that both were busy and both had to hurry.
The women's friends and the first of them, the Countess Lydia Ivanovna, Alexi Alexandrovich, weren't thinking.
All women, just like women, were scary and disgusted by him.
XXII
Alexey Alexandrovich forgot about Count Lydia Ivanovna, but she didn't forget him.
In this most difficult moment of lonely despair, she came to him and entered his office without a report.
She caught him in the same position he was sitting in with his head on both hands.
'J'ai force la consigne,' she said, walking in fast steps and breathing hard from excitement and rapid motion. 'I heard it all!
Alexei Alexandrovich!
My friend! 'She continued, shaking his hand firmly with both hands and looking into his eyes with her beautiful thoughtful eyes.'
Alexei Alexandrovich, frowning, climbed up and, with his hand out of her hand, moved her chair.
'Would you please, Countess? I do not accept because I am sick, Countess,' he said, and his lips shook.
'My friend! 'I repeat the Countess Lydia Ivanovna, keeping an eye on him, and all of a sudden her eyebrows rose from the inside, forming a triangle on her forehead; her ugly yellow face became even more ugly; but Alexei Alexandrovich felt that she felt sorry for him and was ready to cry.
And he found mercy: he grabbed her swollen hand, and began kissing her.
'My friend! 'She said to those who were interrupted by the excitement of their voice.' 'You must not give up grief.
Your grief is great, but you must find comfort.
'I am broken, I am killed, I am no more than a man!' said Alexi Alexandrovich, releasing her hand, but continuing to look into her tears-filled eyes. 'My situation is terrible because I don't find anywhere, and I don't find the points of support in me.
'You will find a support, and look for it not in me, though I ask you to believe in my friendship,' she said with a sigh. 'The support is our love, the love he has bequeathed to us.'
His burden is easy,' she said, with the enthralled look that Alexandrovich knew so well. 'He will support you and help you.
Even though these words were so condescending to their high feelings and there was what Alexei Alexandrovich seemed to be redundant, a new, enthralled, recently spread mystical mood in Petersburg, Alexei Alexandrovich was pleased to hear now.
'I am weak. I've been destroyed.
I didn't see anything coming, and now I don't understand it.
'My friend,' said Lydia Ivanovna.
'It is not the loss of what is now, not this,' he continued. 'I'm not sorry.
But I can't help but be ashamed in front of people for what I'm in.
It's bad, but I can't. I can't.
'It is not you who have done the great forgiveness that I admire and all of you have done, but it is he who dwells in your heart,' said the Countess Lydia Ivanovna, enthrallingly raising your eyes, 'and therefore you cannot be ashamed of what you have done.'
Alexey Alexandrovich frowned and, with his hands folded, began to crack his fingers.
'We need to know all the details,' he said in a thin voice. 'The power of man has limits, Countess, and I have found the limit of mine.
All day today, I had to make orders, house orders, coming out of my new, lonely situation.
The servants, the governess, the bills...
That little fire burned me, I couldn't stand it.
At lunch... I almost left lunch yesterday.
I couldn't bear the way my son looked at me.
He didn't ask me the meaning of all this, but he wanted to ask, and I couldn't stand that look.
He was afraid to look at me, but it's not enough...
Alexei Alexandrovich wanted to mention the bill that had been brought to him, but his voice trembled, and he stopped.
That bill, on blue paper, for hats, ribbons, he couldn't remember without feeling sorry for himself.
'I understand, my friend,' said Countess Lydia Ivanovna. 'I understand everything.
You won't find help and comfort in me, but I only came here to help you if I can.
If I could take all these little degrading care away from you...
I understand you need a woman's word, a woman's order.
You're entrusting me?
Alexei Alexandrovich shook her hand in silence and gratefully.
'We'll take Sergeus together.
I'm not good at practical things. But I'll take it, I'll be your housekeeper.
Don't thank me.
I'm not doing it myself...
'I can't thank you enough.
'But, my friend, do not give up this feeling of which you have spoken,' to be ashamed that there is a Christian's highest height: whoever humiliates himself will be exalted.
And you can't thank me. We must thank him and ask for his help.
In him alone we will find peace, comfort, salvation, and love,' she said, and when she looked up to the sky, she began to pray, as Alexis Alexandrovich understood by her silence.
Alexey Alexandrovich listened to her now, and those expressions that were not previously unpleasant to him but seem redundant now seemed natural and comforting.
Alexey Alexandrovich did not like this new, enthralled spirit.
He was a religious man interested in religion, mainly in the political sense, and a new doctrine, which allowed for some new interpretations, precisely because it opened the door to argument and analysis, was in principle unpleasant to him.
He used to be cold and even hostile to this new teaching and to the Countess Lydia Ivanovna, who was attracted to it, never argued, but carefully ignored her challenges.
Now, for the first time, he listened to her words with pleasure and did not object internally to them.
'I am very, very grateful to you for your deeds and your words,' he said, when she finished praying.
The Countess Lydia Ivanovna once again shook both the hands of her friend.
'Now I am getting down to business,' she said with a smile, silently and crying out of her face the rest of her tears. 'I'm going to Serezha.
Only as a last resort will I come to you. 'And she stood up and went out.
The Countess Lydia Ivanovna went to half of Serezha and there, tearing tears on the cheeks of a frightened boy, told him that his father was a saint and that his mother had died.
'---the Countess Lydia Ivanovna fulfilled her promise.
She's really taken care of the arrangement and maintenance of Alexei Alexandrovich's house. But she did not exaggerate by saying that she was not strong in practical matters.
All of her orders had to be changed because they were not executed, and they had been changed by Cornei, the valet of Alexei Alexandrovich, who now undetected Karenin's entire house and reported to him quietly and carefully during the dressing of the barin what he needed.
But Lydia Ivanovna's help was still highly valid: she gave her moral support to Alexey Alexandrovich in her love and respect for him, and in particular that she thought that she had almost converted him into Christianity, that is, out of indifference and laziness, turned him into a warm and firm supporter of the new explanation of Christian teachings that had recently spread in Petersburg.
It was easy for Alexei Alexandrovich to see that.
Aleksey Alexandrovich, like Lydia Ivanovna and others who shared their views, was completely devoid of the depth of imagination, the mental ability that makes the ideas created by imagination so valid that they require consistency with other ideas and reality.
He saw nothing impossible or inappropriate about the notion that the death that exists for the unbelievers does not exist for him, and that since he has full faith, the judge of which he himself is a judge, there is no sin in his soul, and he is already in complete salvation here on earth.
It is true that the ease and error of this notion of his faith was vaguely felt to Alexei Alexandrovich, and he knew that when he did not think that his forgiveness was an act of supreme power at all, gave himself up to that immediate feeling, he felt more happiness than when, as now, every minute he thought that Christ lived in his soul, and that, by signing the papers, he was doing his will; but for Alexey Alexandrovich to think so, he needed so much in his humiliation to have that, even if it were a fictional height, with which he, despised by all, could despise others that he had held on as salvation for his supposed salvation.
XXIII
The Countess Lydia Ivanovna was married by a very young ecstatic girl to a rich, noble, good-natured and devious funny man.
In the second month, the husband abandoned her, and on her enthralled confidence in tenderness he responded only with ridicule and even hostility, which people who knew both the good heart of the count and saw no shortcomings in the enthralled Lydia could not explain to themselves.
Since then, although they had not been divorced, they had lived apart, and when the husband had met with the wife, he had always treated her with an unmistakable poisonous mockery, the cause of which could not be understood.
Countess Lydia Ivanovna has long since ceased to be in love with her husband, but she has never ceased to be in love with anyone ever since.
She was in love with a few people suddenly, and with men and women; she was in love with almost all people, something particularly outstanding.
She was in love with all the new princesses and princes who became related to the king's family name, and was in love with one mitropolitan, one vicar, and one priest.
She was in love with one journalist, three Slavs, Komisarov; one minister, one doctor, one English missionary, and Karenina.
All these love, then weakened and intensified, did not prevent her from pursuing the most common and complex court and secular relations.
But ever since she took Karenin under her special protection after the disaster, since she worked at Karen's house to care for his well-being, she's felt that all the other love isn't real, and that she's really in love with Karenin now.
The feeling she now felt for him seemed stronger than all her previous feelings.
By analysing her feelings and comparing it to the old ones, she clearly saw that she would not have been in love with Komisarov if he had not saved the life of the king, would not have been in love with Ristic-Kujic, had it not been for a Slavic question, but that Karenina loved for himself, for his high ununderstandable soul, for her sweet, thin sound of his voice with his long intonations, for his tired look, for his character, and his soft white hands with swollen veins.
Not only was she happy to meet him, but she looked on his face for signs of the impression she had made on him.
He wanted to like her not only with words, but with all his specialness.
She's done more toilets for him now than ever before.
She made herself dream about what would have happened if she hadn't been married and he was free.
She was blushing when he walked into the room, and she couldn't hold a smile of joy when he said something nice to her.
For a few days now, Countess Lydia Ivanovna has been in great excitement.
She found out that Anna was with Wronsky in Petersburg.
You should have saved Alexei Alexandrovich from dating her, you should have saved him from even the painful knowledge that this horrible woman is in the same city as him and that he can meet her every minute.
Lydia Ivanovna, through her acquaintances, was scouting about what these disgusting people were going to do, as she called Anna with Vronski, and trying to lead all the movements of her friend in these days so that he would not be able to meet them.
The young Adjutant, a friend of Vronsky's, through whom she received information and who, through Countess Lydia Ivanovna, had hoped to obtain a concession, told her that they had finished their business and left another day.
Lydia Ivanovna was already calming down, just as she had received a note the other morning, whose handwriting she had been horrified to learn.
It was Anna Karenna's handwriting.
The envelope was made of thick, like a foot, of paper; on long yellow paper there was a huge monogram, and the letter smelled beautiful.
'Who brought it?
'The commissioner from the hotel.'
Countess Lydia Ivanovna couldn't sit down long enough to read the letter.
She had a heart attack, which she was exposed to.
When she calmed down, she read the following French letter:
"Madame la Comtesse," the Christian feelings that fill your heart, give me, I feel, unforgivable courage to write to you.
I'm unhappy to be separated from my son.
I beg your permission to see him one time before I leave.
Forgive me for reminding you of myself.
I'm talking to you, not to Alexei Alexandrovich, just because I don't want to make this generous man suffer with a memory of himself.
Knowing your friendship with him, you'll understand me.
Will you send Serezha to me, or should I come to the house at a known, appointed time, or will you let me know when and where I can see him outside the house?
I'm not suggesting a waiver, knowing the generosity of who it depends on.
You can't imagine the desire to see him that I feel, so you can't imagine the gratitude that your help will bring to me.
Anna."
Everything in the letter was annoying to Countess Lydia Ivanovna: both the content and the hint of generosity, and in particular the loose tone that seemed to her.
'Tell me that there will be no answer,' said the Countess Lydia Ivanovna, and immediately, when she opened the bouvar, wrote to Alexei Alexandrovich, hoping to see him at the first hour on a greeting in the palace.
"I need to talk to you about an important and sad matter. That's where we'll agree.
It's best I have where I tell you to make your tea.
It's necessary.
"He lays a cross, but he also gives strength," she added, to prepare it for a little bit.
Countess Lydia Ivanovna usually wrote two and three notes a day to Alexei Alexandrovich.
She loved this process of communication with him, which was elegant and mysterious, as she lacked in her personal relations.
XXIV
Congratulations are over.
Those who had left had been talking about the latest news of the day, the new awards received and the relocation of important employees.
'As Countess Mary Borisovne, the military ministry, and the chief of staff, Princess Watkowski,' said, speaking to the high beauty of the lady who asked him about the move, the gray old lady in the gold-stained coat.
'And I am adjutant,' replied the lady, smiling.
You're from the spiritual department. And you have Karenina as your assistant.
'Hello, Prince! 'The old man said, shaking the hand of the right man.'
'What did you say about Karenin? 'The prince said.'
'He and the Putyatov received Alexander Nevsky.
'I thought he had one.
'No, I'm not.
Look at him,' said the old man, pointing his hat to a room in the door with an influential member of the Karenin State Council in a court-martial with a new red ribbon over his shoulder. 'Lucky and happy as a penny of copper,' he added, stopping to shake the hand of the hand of the handsome chamberlain.
'No, he has grown old,' said the Chamberlain.
'Of concern.'
He's writing all the projects now.
He's not gonna let the poor go until he puts everything down.
'How old are you?
Il fait des pasions.
I think Countess Lydia Ivanovna is jealous of his wife now.
'Well, then!
Countess Lydia Ivanovna, please don't say anything bad.
'Is it wrong that she is in love with Karenina?'
'Is it true that Karenina is here?
'I mean, not here in the palace, but in Petersburg.'
I met them yesterday, with Alexei Vronsky, Bras dessus, Bras dessous, on the sea.
'C'est un homme qui n'a pas...' began the valet, but stopped, giving way and bowing to the king's last name.
In this way, they spoke of Alexei Alexandrovich, condemning him and laughing at him, while he began his journey to a member of the Council of State, whom he had captured, and did not stop his presentation for a moment, in order not to miss him, setting out a financial project for him.
Almost at the same time as his wife left Alexei Alexandrovich, he was struck by the most bitter event for a man's employee: the end of the upward movement of service.
The end came, and everyone clearly saw it, but he himself did not realize that his career was over.
Whether the encounter with Stremov, the misfortune with his wife, or simply the fact that Alexei Alexandrovich reached the limit that he was meant to, but it became clear to everyone this year that his service was over.
He was still an important member of many commissions and committees; but he was a man who was all out and was no longer expected.
Whatever he said, whatever he suggested, he was heard as if what he was offering was well known and there was something that wasn't necessary.
But it didn't feel that way and, on the contrary, having been removed from direct participation in government activities, it was clearer than ever before that it saw faults and errors in others' activities and felt obliged to point to the means to correct them.
Shortly after his separation from his wife, he began writing his first note on the new trial from the countless series of inappropriate notes on all the branches of government that he was destined to write to him.
Not only did he not notice his hopeless position in the service world, but he was more pleased with his activities than he had ever been.
"A married man cares for the worldly things, how to please his wife, a single man cares for God, how to please God," says the apostle Paul, and Alexi Alexandrovich, who is now in charge of the writing, often recalled the text.
He felt that since he was left without his wife, he had served God more than ever.
The apparent impatience of a member of the Council who wanted to leave him did not embarrass him; he stopped speaking only when the member, after taking advantage of the king's name, slipped away from him.
When he was alone, he put his head down, gathering his thoughts, then looked back and went to the door, which he hoped would meet Countess Lydia Ivanovna.
'And how strong and healthy they are all physically,' thought Alexey Alexandrovich, looking at the mighty man with the scrubbed varnish of the chamberger and the red neck of the prince in his uniform, who had to pass by. 'It is rightly said that everyone in the world is evil,' he thought, touching the camouflage again.
As he moved his feet quickly, he bowed to these gentlemen, who spoke of him, and looked at the door and looked for the Countess Lydia Ivanovna with his eyes.
'Ah! "Alexei Alexandrovich!" said the old man, angryly shiny with his eyes, while Karenin levelled with him and leaned his head with a cold gesture. 'I have not yet congratulated you,' he said, pointing to his new ribbon.
'Thank you,' replied Alexis Alexandrovich. 'What a beautiful day it is today,' he added, in his habit, especially keeping the word "beautiful."
He knew that they had laughed at him, but he did not expect from them anything but hostility, and he was used to it.
When he saw the yellow shoulders of the Countess Lydia Ivanovna coming out of the corset, calling her beautiful thoughtful eyes to him, he smiled, opening his unflinching white teeth, and approached her.
Lydia Ivanovna's toilet has cost her a lot of trouble, just like all her toilets have been lately.
The purpose of her bathroom was now quite the reverse of the one she was chasing thirty years ago.
Then she wanted to decorate herself with something, and the more, the better. Now, on the contrary, it had to be so unsympathetic and decorated that it only cared that the opposite of these ornaments with its appearance would not be too terrible.
And in the case of Alexei Alexandrovich, she did, and she seemed attractive to him.
To him, she was the only island not only of kindness to him, but of love among the sea of hostility and ridicule that surrounded him.
As he walked through the formation of ridiculous views, he naturally reached out to her in love as a plant to light.
'Congratulations,' she said, pointing her eyes at the tape.
By holding back the smile of pleasure, he shook his shoulders, closing his eyes, as if it could not please him.
Countess Lydia Ivanovna knew well that it was one of his greatest joys, even though he would never admit it.
'What is our angel? 'The Countess Lydia Ivanovna said, referring to Serezha.
'I can't say that I'm quite happy with them,' said Alexandrovich, raising his eyebrows and opening his eyes. 'And Sitnikov is not pleased with them.'
(Sitnikov was a teacher entrusted with the secular education of Serezi.)
As I told you, there is some coldness in it to the very main issues that must touch the soul of every man and child, &quot; he began to express his thoughts on the only other than the service he was interested in -- bringing up a son.
When he returned to life and activity with the help of Lydia Ivanovich, he felt he had a responsibility to care for his remaining son.
Never before, he had devoted some time to a theoretical study of the subject.
And after reading several books of anthropology, pedagogy, and didactics, Alexis Alexandrovich drew up a plan for his upbringing and, after inviting the best peterburg teacher to guide him, took up the matter.
And it was always about him.
'Yes, but the heart?'
I see in him the heart of my father, and with such a heart a child cannot be fooled,' said Countess Lydia Ivanovna with delight.
'Yes, maybe...'
As for me, I'm doing my duty. That's all I can do.
'You will come to me,' said Countess Lydia Ivanovna, silently, 'we need to talk about a sad matter for you.
I'd give anything to spare you some memories, but that's not what others think.
I got a letter from her.
She's here in Petersburg.
Aleksey Alexandrovich shuddered at the mention of his wife, but immediately his face became immobile, expressing complete helplessness in the matter.
'I was waiting for this,' he said.
The Countess Lydia Ivanovna looked at him enthralled, and tears of admiration in the majesty of his soul came to her eyes.
XXV
When Alexey Alexandrovich entered a small, old-fashioned porcelain with portraits, the comfy office of Countess Lydia Ivanovna wasn't the landlady.
She was changing.
On the round table there was a tablecloth and a Chinese instrument and a silver teapot.
Alexey Alexandrovich looked at countless familiar portraits that adorned the office and, sitting on the table, opened the Gospel on it.
The noise of the Countess' silk dress entertained him.
'Well, now we shall sit still,' said Countess Lydia Ivanovna, with an agitated smile rushing between the table and the couch, 'and we shall speak for our tea.
After a few words of preparation, Countess Lydia Ivanovna, who was heavily breathing and blushing, handed over the letter she had received to Alexei Alexandrovich.
When he read the letter, he kept quiet for a long time.
'I do not suppose that I should have the right to refuse her,' he said shyly, raising my eyes.
'My friend! You see no evil in anyone!
'I see, on the contrary, that everything is evil.
But is that true? — 1 Peter 2: 1 - 3.
His face was indecisive and seeking advice, support and guidance in a case that he did not understand.
'No,' interrupted his Countess Lydia Ivanovna. 'There is a limit to everything.
I understand immorality,' she said not quite sincerely, because she could never understand what leads women to immorality, 'but I don't understand cruelty, to whom? To you!
How do you stay in the city where you are?
No, live the century, learn the century.
And I'm learning to understand your height and its lowness.
'Who will throw the stone?' 'Alexei Alexandrovich, apparently satisfied with his role, said. 'I have forgiven everything, and therefore I cannot deny her that there is a need for love for her -- love for her son...
'But is it love, my friend?
Is it sincere?
Let's say you forgave, you forgive... but do we have the right to act on this angel's soul?
He thinks she's dead.
He prays for her and asks God to forgive her sins... and that's better.
What's he gonna think?
'I didn't think about it,' said Alexis Alexandrovich, obviously agreeing.
The Countess Lydia Ivanovna covered her face with her hands and shut her mouth.
She prayed.
'If you ask my advice,' she said, praying and opening your face, 'I do not advise you to do so.
Don't I see how you suffer, how it opened your wounds?
But let's just say you're always forgetting yourself.
But what does that mean?
For your new suffering, for your child's suffering?
If there's anything human left in it, she shouldn't want it.
No, I don't hesitate to advise, and if you let me, I'll write to her.
And Alexei Alexandrovich agreed, and Countess Lydia Ivanovna wrote the following French letter:
"My gracious lady,
The memory of you for your son may lead to questions on his part that cannot be answered without putting a spirit of condemnation into the child's soul of what should be holy to him, and therefore I ask you to understand your husband's refusal in a spirit of Christian love.
I beg the Most High to be merciful to you.
The Countess of Lydia."
This letter has achieved the hidden purpose that Countess Lydia Ivanovna hid from herself.
It's deeply insulted Anna.
For his part, when he returned home from Lydia Ivanovna, he could not submit himself to his usual activities on that day and find the peace of mind of the believer and the saved man he had previously felt.
The memory of his wife, who was so much to blame before him and before whom he was as holy as the Countess Lydia Ivanovna had rightly told him, should not have embarrassed him; but he was not at peace: he could not understand the books he had read, could not repel the painful memories of his relationship with her, of the mistakes he now thought he had made concerning her.
The memory of his return from the races, her admission of infidelity (in particular, that he demanded only external decency from her and not a duel), as remorse, tormented him.
His memory of the letter he wrote to her, especially his forgiveness, which no one needed, and his concern for another's child burned his heart with shame and remorse.
He now felt the same sense of shame and remorse by going over everything he had done to her and remembering the awkward words he had made to her after long hesitation.
"But what am I to blame?" 'He said to himself. And that question has always given rise to another question -- whether they feel otherwise, whether they like it or not, whether these other people, these Vronskys, the Oblons... these cambers with fat caviars, are getting married.
And it seemed to him that a number of these juicy, strong, unmistakable people, who had always, involuntarily, drawn his curious attention to themselves everywhere.
He turned those thoughts away, tried to convince himself that he lived not for the present, for the temporary life, but for everlasting life, that there was peace and love in his soul.
But what he did in this timeless, worthless life, seemed to him to have made some small mistakes, torturing him as if there had never been the eternal salvation he believed in.
But the temptation did not last long, and soon the calm and height that allowed him to forget what he did not want to remember restored to the soul of Alexey Alexandrovich.
XXVI
'Well, Capitonich?' 'Serezha said, bloated and funny, returning from the walk on the day before his birth, and giving his assembly to a tall one, smiling at a small man from his height, to an old doorman. 'What, was there a tied-up official today?'
You got Dad?
'Received.
Only the ruler came out, and I reported,' said the doorman, winking with joy. 'I think I'll take it off.
'Serezha! 'Slavish guverner said, staying in the doors leading into the inner rooms. 'Take it off yourself.
But Serezha, though he heard a weak guverner's voice, ignored him.
He stood by his hand behind the doorman's bandage and looked him in the face.
'Well, Dad did what he wanted for him, didn't he?
The doorman nodded his head in the affirmative.
A tied official who'd gone seven times to ask Alexei Alexandrovich for something, was interested in Serezha and the doorman.
Serezha caught him once in his hay and heard him sorry to ask the doorman to report himself, saying he had to die with his children.
Since then, Serezha, having met another official in the blues, has become interested in him.
'Well, was it a pleasure?' 'He asked.'
'I'm so not happy!
Almost jumps out of here.
'Did you bring anything?' 'I asked Serezha, silently.'
'Well, sir,' whispered the doorman, shaking his head, 'it is from the Countess.
Serezha immediately realized that what the doorman was talking about was a gift from Countess Lydia Ivanovna to his birth.
'What are you saying?
Where?
'Corney came to see his father.
That's gotta be a good one!
'How big?
Is this gonna happen?
'Lower, yes, good.
'A book?'
'No, the thing.
Go, go, Vasily Lukić calls,' said the doorman, listening to the guverner's steps approaching and carefully putting his pen in half of the removed glove, which had the power to tie him up, and winking at him with his head on Vunić.
'Vassili Lukić, now! 'Serezha answered with that happy and loving smile, who had always defeated the executive Vasilia Lukić.'
Serezha had too much fun, too much happiness, so that he could not share with his friend the doorman the family joy he had learned in the summer garden from the niece of the Countess Lydia Ivanovna.
This joy seemed particularly important to him by the coincidence of the official's joy and his joy of bringing toys.
Serezha felt that today was a day on which everyone should be happy and happy.
'Do you know that dad got Alexander Nevsky?
'I don't know!
We've come to congratulate you.
'Well, is he happy?'
'How unjoyful of the king's mercy!
So he deserved it,' said the doorman strictly and seriously.
Serezha looked at the doorman's face, which had been studied to the slightest detail, especially his chin, hanging between gray buckenbards, which no one had seen except Serezha, who had always looked at him from the bottom.
'Well, how long have you had your daughter?
The doorman's daughter was a ballet dancer.
'When do we go on Sundays?'
They have a student, too. And you too, sir, go.
When Serezha came to the room, instead of sitting down for lessons, he told the teacher his suggestion that what had been brought must have been a car. 'What do you think?' 'He asked.'
But Vasily Lukić was only thinking about teaching a grammar lesson for a teacher who would come at two o'clock.
'No, you just tell me, Vasily Lukić,' he asked suddenly, sitting behind a desk and holding a book, 'what is greater than Alexander Nevsky?
Do you know how dad got Alexander Nevsky?
Vasily Lukić replied that more than Alexander Nevsky was Vladimir.
'And higher?
'And above all, Andrei the First Caller.'
'And what is higher than Andrei?'
'I don't know.
'How, and you don't know?' --and Serezha, leaning on his hands, went into thought.
His thoughts were most complex and varied.
He thought about how his father would suddenly receive him and Vladimir and Andrei, and how he would be much nicer in class today, and how he himself, when he was big, would get all the orders and what would be made up above Andrei.
They're just gonna make it up, and he's gonna deserve it.
They're gonna make it up, and he's gonna deserve it.
In such reflections, the time passed, and when the teacher came, the lesson about the circumstances of the time and place and course of action was not ready, and the teacher was not only displeased but also disappointed.
This displeasure of the teacher touched Serezha.
He felt innocent for not learning a lesson; but no matter how hard he tried, he was determined not to do so: as the teacher interpreted him, he believed and understood, but once he was alone, he was determined not to remember and understand that the short and so understandable word "suddenly" was a circumstance of course. But he still felt sorry for the fact that he upset the teacher and wanted to comfort him.
He chose a minute when the teacher looked silently in the book.
'Michail Ivanovich, when are your birthdays?' 'He asked suddenly.'
'You'd think better about your work, and birthdays don't matter to a reasonable being.
It's the same day as the others you have to work on.
Serezha carefully looked at the teacher, at his rare beard, at the glasses that went down below the line, who was on the nose, and thought that he had heard nothing from what the teacher had explained to him.
He knew that the teacher didn't think what he was saying, that he felt it in the tone to which it was said.
"But why did they all conspire to say things in the same way, all boring and unnecessary?
Why does he push me away, why doesn't he love me?" 'He asked himself with sadness and couldn't come up with an answer.'
XXVII
After the teacher, there was a father's lesson.
Before my father came, Serezha sat down at the table playing with a knife and started thinking.
One of Serezia's favorite activities was to find her mother during a walk.
He did not believe in death at all, and especially in her death, despite what Lydia Ivanovna had told him and his father confirmed it, and therefore, after being told that she had died, he sought her out during the walk.
Every woman was full, graceful, with dark hair, and his mother.
When he saw such a woman in his heart, he felt tenderness, as if he was suffocating, and tears appeared in his eyes.
And he was about to expect her to approach him, raise the veil.
Her whole face will be seen, she will smile, she will hug him, he will hear her scent, he will feel the tenderness of her hand, and he will cry happily, as he once fell into her feet in the evening and she tickled him, and he laughed and bite her white with the rings of his hand.
Then, when he learned by accident from the nanny that his mother had not died, and his father and Lydia Ivanovna explained to him that she had died for him because she was not good (which he could not believe anymore because he loved her), he also sought and waited for her.
Today, in the summer garden, there was a lady in a purple veil who was followed by him, waiting for it to be her, as she approached them along the path.
The lady didn't get to them and went somewhere.
Now more than ever, Serezha felt the tide of love for her and now, forgetting, waiting for his father, cut the whole end of the table with a knife, staring brightly at him and thinking about her.
'Papa is coming! 'Cause he was entertained by Vasily Lukić.
Serezha jumped up, came up to his father, and kissed his hand, and looked closely at him, looking for signs of joy in receiving Alexander Nevsky.
'Did you walk well? 'Alexei Alexandrovich said, sitting on his chair, bringing the book of the Old Testament to him and opening it.'
Although he had repeatedly told Serezha that every Christian should know the sacred history, he had often dealt with the book in the Old Testament himself, and Serezha noticed it.
'Yes, it was very fun, Dad,' said Serezha, sitting side by side on the chair and rocking it, which was forbidden. 'I saw Nadika (Nadenka was raised by Lydia Ivanovna's niece).
She told me you were given a new star.
Are you happy, Dad?
'First of all, don't swing, please,' said Alexis Alexandrovich. 'And secondly, the road is not reward, but work.'
And I'd like you to understand that.
If you work hard, learn to gain a reward, you will find it hard; but when you work hard,' said Alexei Alexandrovich, remembering how he maintained his sense of duty in the boring work of this morning, which took place in the signing of one hundred and eighteen papers -- you will find a reward in it, in every effort you can make.
With tenderness and joy, Serezhi's eyes faded and fell under his father's eyes.
It was the very familiar tone that his father had always treated him with and that Serezha had learned to fake.
His father always spoke to him -- that's how Serezha felt -- as if he was talking to some imaginary boy, one of those books, but nothing like Serezha. And Serezha always tried to pretend to be that book boy with his father.
'You understand that, I hope?' 'Father' said the father.
'Yes, Papa,' answered Serezha, pretending to be an imaginary boy.
The lesson consisted of learning by heart several verses from the Gospel and repeating the beginning of the Old Testament.
The poems from the Gospel of Sereza were well known, but the minute he spoke them, he looked at the bone of his father's forehead, which was so steep at the temple, that he was confused and the end of one verse on the same word was moved to the beginning of the other.
It was obvious to Alexei Alexandrovich that he didn't understand what he was saying, and it was annoying to him.
He frowned and began to explain what Serezha had heard many times and could never remember, because he understood too clearly -- like, suddenly there's a pattern.
Serezha looked scaredly at his father and thought only of one thing: whether he made him repeat what he had said, as he had sometimes said.
And that thought scared Serezha so much that he didn't understand anything anymore.
But my father didn't make me repeat it, and he moved on to a lesson from the Old Testament.
Serezha spoke well of the events, but when he had to answer questions about what he had learned, he knew nothing, even though he had already been punished for the lesson.
But the place where he couldn't say anything anymore, and he was walking around, and he was cutting a table, and he was swinging on a chair, was where he had to tell him about the subtopean Patriarchs.
Of them, he knew no one but Enoch, who was taken to heaven alive.
He used to remember the names, but now he forgot all about them, especially because he had his beloved face from all the Old Testament, and he was tied up in his head by a whole long movement of thought, to which he now stood, staring at the chain of his father's watches and up to half the button of his vest.
The death he was told so often about, Serezha didn't believe completely.
He didn't believe that people he loved could die, and that he was special-- that he would die himself.
It was completely impossible and unclear for him.
But he was told that everyone would die; he asked even people whom he believed, and they confirmed it; the nanny also spoke, though reluctantly.
But Enoch didn't die, so not everyone dies. "Why can't anyone deserve to be taken to heaven in front of God?" 'I thought Serezha.'
The bad ones, that is, the ones Serezha didn't like -- they could have died, but the good ones could all be like Enoch.
'Well, which Patriarchs?'
'Enoch, Enos.
'That's what you said.
Bad, Serezha, very bad.
'If you do not try to learn what is most important for a Christian,' said the father, rising up, 'what can take you?
I'm not happy with you, and Peter Ignatić is not happy with you...
I have to punish you.
The father and the teacher were both displeased with Sergeus, and he really did not study very well.
But there's no way to say he was an incompetent boy.
On the contrary, he was much more capable than the boys that the teacher had set as the example of Serezé.
From his father's point of view, he didn't want to learn what he was taught.
In fact, he could not learn that.
He could not because he had demands in his heart that were more binding than those that his father and his teacher had stated.
These demands were in contradiction, and he fought directly with his teachers.
He was nine years old, he was a child; but he knew his soul, she was dear to him; he guarded her like an eyelid, and did not let anyone into his soul without the key of love.
His tutors complained that he did not want to study, and his soul was full of thirst for knowledge.
And he studied from Capitonich, the nanny, Nadia, Vasily Lukić, not the teachers.
The water the father and the teacher had been waiting for on their wheels had long since leaked and worked elsewhere.
My father punished Serezha, not letting him go to Nadika, the niece of Lydia Ivanovna; but this punishment proved to be good for Serezha.
Vasily Lukić was spirited and showed him how to make windmills.
I've spent the entire evening working and dreaming about how to make a mill like this to spin around -- grab by the wings or tie yourself -- and spin.
Serezha's mother wasn't thinking all night, but when he lay in bed, he suddenly remembered her and prayed in his own words that his mother should stop hiding tomorrow, at his birth, and come to him.
'Vassili Lukić, do you know what I've been praying for?
'To learn better?'
'No, I'm not.
'Toys?'
You're not gonna guess.
It's great, but it's a secret!
When it's done, I'll tell you.
Didn't you guess?
'No, I won't guess.
You tell me,' said Vasily Lukić, smiling that he had rarely been with him. 'Well, lie down, I'm putting out the candle.'
'And I can see what I see and what I pray for without a candle.
I almost told you a secret! 'Funny laughing,' said Serezha.
When the candle was removed, Serezha heard and felt his mother.
She stood over him and caressed him with her lover's eyes.
But the mills came, the knife, everything was mixed up, and he fell asleep.
XXVIII
Upon arriving in Petersburg, Wronsky and Anna stayed at one of the best hotels. One at a time, in the lower floor, Anna is upstairs with a child, a nurse, and a girl, in a large section of four rooms.
On the first day of his visit, he went to see his brother.
That's where he caught his mother coming from Moscow on business.
His mother and sister-in-law met him as usual; they asked him about a trip abroad, talked about common acquaintances, but never mentioned his connection to Anna.
The other day, however, the brother, when he had arrived in the morning in the city, had asked him about her himself, and Alexey Wronsky had directly told him that he viewed his relationship with Karenina as marriage; that he hoped to have a divorce and then would marry her; and until then, he considered her as his wife, like any other wife, and asked him to give it to his mother and his wife.
'If the light doesn't approve of it, I don't care,' he said, 'but if my family wants to be related to me, they should be in the same relationship with my wife.
The older brother, who had always respected the judgment of the lesser, did not know well whether he was right or not until the light had resolved the matter; for his part, he had nothing against it and went to Anna with Alexei.
He spoke to Anna in front of his brother, as he did before them all, and you treated her as a close friend, but it was implied that the brother knew their relationship, and it was said that Anna was going to the house of Bronski.
Despite his secular experience, he was in a strange error because of the new situation in which he was living.
He seemed to have to understand that the light was closed to him and Anna; but now there were some vague thoughts in his mind that it was only in the old days, and now, with rapid progress (he was now invisible to himself), that society &apos; s view had changed and that the question of whether they would be accepted into society had not yet been resolved.
"It will be possible," he thought, "the light of the court will not accept it, but the loved ones can and must understand it properly."
You can sit for a few hours with your legs in the same position, if you know that nothing's gonna stop you from changing your position; but if you know that you have to sit there with your legs so fried, you're gonna have convulsions, and you're gonna have your legs twitched, and you're gonna wiggle, and you're gonna wiggle to a place where you want to pull them out.
This was the experience of the Warrior in relation to light.
Although he knew deep down that the light was closed to them, he tried to see if the light would change now and whether they would be accepted.
But he soon noticed that although the light was open to him personally, it was closed to Anna.
As in the game of a mouse cat, the hands raised for him were immediately lowered in front of Anna.
One of the first ladies of Peterburg's light he saw was his cousin Betsy.
'At last! 'She was happy to meet him.' 'And Anna?
I'm so glad!
Where are you staying?
I imagine, after your lovely journey, you are horrified by our Petersburg; I imagine your honeymoon in Rome.
What's the divorce?
Did they do all this?
He noted that Betsy's admiration had diminished when she learned that the divorce had not yet taken place.
'The stone will be thrown at me, I know,' she said, 'but I will come to Anna; yes, I will certainly come.
You won't be here long?
Indeed, she came to Anna the same day; but her tone was no longer the same as before.
She was evidently proud of her courage and wanted Anna to appreciate her loyalty to her friendship.
She stayed no more than ten minutes talking about the secular news, and when she left, she said,
'You didn't tell me when the divorce was.
Let's say I threw my cap through the mill, but the other collars raised will beat you cold until you get married.
And it's so easy now.
Ca se fat.
So you're going on Friday?
It's too bad we won't see each other again.
By the tone of Betsy, Wronsky could have understood what he needed to expect from the light; but he had made another attempt in his family.
He wasn't hoping for his mother.
He knew that her mother, who admired Anna so much during her first encounter, was now inexorable to her for causing her to disrupt her son's career.
But he had high hopes for Varya, his brother's wife.
He felt that she would not throw a stone and would go to Anna with ease and determination and accept it.
On the other day, when he arrived, he went to see her and made one express his wish.
'You know, Alexei,' she said, listening to him, 'how much I love you and how much I am willing to do for you, but I kept quiet because I knew that I couldn't be useful to you and Anna Arkadievna,' she said, especially with the care of saying 'Anna Arkadievna'. 'Do not think, please, that I may judge.'
Never; maybe I would have done the same in her place.
I don't go in and I can't go into the details,' she said, looking shyly at his dark face. 'But you have to say things by name.'
You want me to go see her, take her and rehab her in society; but you realize I can't do that.
My daughters are growing up, and I have to live in the light of my husband.
Well, I'm gonna go to Anna Arkadievna; she's gonna realize that I can't call her to me, or I'm gonna have to do it so that she doesn't meet those who look otherwise: that's gonna insult her.
I can't lift it...
'I don't think she should fall more than the hundreds of women you take! -- even darker, he interrupted it and stood up silently, realizing that the daughter-in-law &apos; s decision was unalterable.
'Alexei! Don't be mad at me.
Please understand that it wasn't my fault,' said Varya with a shy smile, looking at him.
'I'm not angry with you,' he said, with the same sadness, 'but I'm in two pains.
It hurts me that it's breaking up our friendship.
Let's say it doesn't break, but it weakens.
You realize it can't be different to me either.
And with that, he walked out on her.
He realized that further attempts were futile and that it was necessary to stay in Petersburg for a few days, as in a foreign city, avoiding any contact with his former light, so as not to be subjected to the troubles and insults that were so painful for him.
One of the main problems of the situation in Petersburg was that Alexei Alexandrovich and his name seemed to be everywhere.
You couldn't start talking about anything so that the conversation wouldn't turn on Alexei Alexandrovich; you couldn't go anywhere without meeting him.
That's at least what it looked like, as a man with a sick finger seems to think, that he's deliberately hurting it with that sickest finger.
Staying in Petersburg seemed more difficult than he had ever seen in Anna a new mood that he did not understand.
It was like she was in love with him, and she was getting cold, irritable and impermeable.
She was tormenting and hiding something from him, and as if she didn't notice the insults that had poisoned his life and for her, with her subtleness, must have been even more painful.
XXIX
One of the purposes of Anna's trip to Russia was to meet her son.
Since she left Italy, the idea of this date has not stopped worrying her.
And the closer she got to Petersburg, the joy and significance of that date seemed to her more and more.
She didn't ask herself how to set up this date.
It seemed natural and simple to see her son when she was in the same city as him; but when she arrived in Petersburg, she suddenly became clear about her current position in society, and she realized that it was difficult to arrange a date.
She's been living in Petersburg for two days.
The thought of her son never left her, but she hasn't seen her son yet.
She felt that she had no right to go straight to the house where she could meet Alexei Alexandrovich.
She could have been kept away and insulted.
It was painful for her to write and to associate with her husband, and to think that she could be calm only when she did not think of her husband.
Seeing her son on a walk, finding out where and when he was going, she wasn't enough: she was so prepared for this date, she had so much to tell him, she wanted to hug him, kiss him.
The old nanny Serezi could help her and teach her. But the nanny was no longer at Alexei Alexandrovich's house.
It's been two days in these swings and in the nanny's search.
After learning about her close relationship with Countess Lydia Ivanovna, Anna decided on the third day to write her a letter that she had worked hard to write, in which she deliberately said that allowing her son to see her son must depend on her husband's generosity.
She knew that if the letter was shown to her husband, he would not refuse her role of generosity.
The commissioner who carried the letter gave her the cruelest and most unexpected reply that there would be no answer.
She never felt as humiliated as the minute she called the commissioner and heard from him a detailed account of how he waited and was then told, "There will be no answer."
Anna felt humiliated, insulted, but saw that Countess Lydia Ivanovna was right in her view.
Her grief was stronger because she was lonely.
She couldn't and didn't want to share it with Wronski.
She knew that for him, despite the fact that he was the main cause of her misery, the question of dating her son would appear to be an unimportant thing.
She knew that he would never be able to understand the depths of her suffering; she knew that she would hate him for his cold tone when it was mentioned.
And she feared it more than anything in the world and therefore hid everything that touched her son from him.
After staying at home all day, she made up the means to date her son and stopped at the decision to write to her husband.
She already wrote this letter when she received a letter from Lydia Ivanovna.
The Countess' silence humbled and subdued her, but the letter, all that she had read between his lines, was so annoying to her, it was so outrageous to her that this rancour appeared to her as compared to her passionate legal affection for her son, that she defied others and stopped blaming herself.
"This coldness is an act of feeling," she said to herself. 'They only need to insult me and torture the child, and I will obey them! No way!
She's worse than me.
I'm not lying at least."
And then she decided that tomorrow, the very day of Serezia's birth, she would go straight to her husband's house, bribe people, cheat, but no matter what happens, she would see her son and destroy that ugly deception that surrounded the poor child.
She went to the toy shop, bought toys, and thought about a plan of action.
She'll be here early in the morning, at eight o'clock, when Alexis Alexandrovich hasn't been up yet.
She will have in her hand the money that will give the doorman and the footman to let her in, and without raising wu-- ala, she will say that she has come to congratulate Serezha's godfather and that she has been instructed to put toys at her son's bed.
She didn't just make the words she'd say to her son.
As much as she thought about it, she couldn't think of anything.
The next day, at 8 a.m., Anna came out of a grilled carriage and called at the big entrance of her former home.
'Come and see what you need.'
'Some lady,' said Capitonich, who was not yet dressed, in her coat and in her claps, looking out the window at a lady covered by a voila at the door itself.
The doorman's assistant, a young stranger to Anna, had just opened the door to her, as she had already entered her door and, having removed a three - piece of paper from the muft, had rushed into his hand.
'Serezha...
Sergei Alexeic,' she said, and went forward.
After checking the paper, the doorman's assistant stopped her at another glass door.
'Who do you want?' 'He asked.'
She didn't hear his words or answer anything.
Noticed the confusion of the unknown, Capitonich himself went out to her, missed the door and asked her what she wanted.
'From Prince Skorodumov to Sergei Alexeich,' she said.
'They have not yet stood up,' said the doorman looking closely.
Anna did not expect that the situation in the front of the house where she had lived for nine years to affect her so much.
One by one, memories, joyous and painful, rose up in her soul, and she forgot why she was here for a moment.
'Will you wait?' 'Said Capitonich, taking off her coat.'
By taking off the coat, Capitonich looked into her face, recognized her, and bowed down silently to her.
'I think, Your Excellency,' he said to her.
She wanted to say something, but the voice refused to make any sounds; she looked at the old man with a guilty plea, and took quick and easy steps to the stairs.
By leaning forward and clinging to the steps, Capitonich followed her, trying to outrun her.
'The teacher may be naked there.
I'll report it.
Anna continued to walk along a familiar ladder without understanding what the old man had said.
'This way, to the left. Sorry it's not clean. 'They are now in the old couch,' said the doorman, out of breath. 'Leave me a moment, Your Excellency, I will look in,' he said, and after overtaking her, he set up a high door and fled behind her. Anna stopped waiting. 'Just wake up,' said the doorman, leaving the door again.
And the minute the doorman said that, Anna heard the sound of the child's zenia. She recognized his son by one voice, and saw him alive before her.
'Let go, let go, let go! 'She spoke and walked into the high door.'
On the right side of the door there was a bed, and on the bed sat, climbing up, a boy in one unbuttoned shirt, and leaning over with a calf, reaching out and racing.
The minute his lips came together, they were in a blissful smile, and with that smile, he fell back slowly and sweetly.
'Serezha! 'She whispered, unable to hear him.'
During her separation from him and the tide of love she had experienced lately, she imagined his four - year - old boy as she loved him most.
Now he wasn't even like she left him; he went further from a four - year - old to an even higher age and lost weight.
What is it?
How evil his face is, how short his hair!
How long are your hands!
How different he has been since she left him!